src-fst-root.lexc.md
* **%ROD** morfemgraense ved pegeroedderne
* **+SUB**  Ungdomsformer
* **+Arch**  archaiske former som agpâ (for anípâ)
* **+Comp**  Tilfoejet 20100228. Anvendes ved +NIQ paa transitiver for skyld -neq ajor/saper/artor/nalu
* **+Coll**  Tilfoejet 20100406 til kaldenavne, der ikke er godkendte fx Aaperaat, men Aaperaa+Coll
* **+Loan**  Tilføjet 20100822 til visse udenlandske ord i hhv. LEXICON V-Loan og LEXICON C-Loan
Vore morfofonemer
* **g2 g3 g4 c2 i2** 
* **u2**  u som skal stå som u foran r: Puurunen.
ch til Heinrich/ Heinriup men kvæler alle ch-sekvenser. Udkommenteret 20181008
* **í á ú î â û ê ô ĩ ã ũ** vokaler i gammel retskrivning

* **+CLB +PUNCT +LEFT +RIGHT** 

### Vore magiske symboler

* **%TRUNC**  minus-suffikser, trunkerer
* **%CLIT**  Klitika
* **%STRUNC**  trunkerer både vokal og konsonant
* **%PRONTRUNC** 
* **%POSSESSORTRUNC** 
* **%likTRUNC** 
* **%VCTRUNC** 
* **%CVqTRUNC** 
* **%VTRUNC** 
* **%qaGEMIN** 
* **%qoGEMIN** 
* **%EPENT** Epentetisk vokal mellem konsonant og clitis i fremmedord
* **%PROP** Blokering mod vokalreglerne
* **%ALTINF** Alternerende infinitiver ved rpoq
* **%ProgI** Tilfoejet 20100117 for at haandtere progressiv i-assimilation ved ARAQ og UTIGE

* **%GEMEQ** gemineringskode til p-bøjede på seq og leq
* **%^GEMS** 
* **%^GEMC** 
* **%^GEM** 
* **%^Loan** 

## Flag diacritics

We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:

| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.

| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.

| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: København > københavner.

## LEXICON Root 
- **  Nomen        ;  ** 
- **  Verbum       ; ** 
- **  oqr          ;  **  partikler og pronominer
- **  ateq         ;  **  proprier (baade personer og steder)
- **  Punctuation  ; ** 
- **  Symbols      ; ** 
- **  numeralier   ; ** 
- **  Forkortelser ; ** 
- **  Akronymer    ; ** 
- **  Pronomen     ; ** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-kal/blob/main/src/fst/root.lexc)</small>

---
